Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-618
Electronic, defined.

Electronic means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 380.